Hawaii statutes.
§147-32 Rules and regulations. The
department of agriculture shall have the necessary powers to carry out and
effectuate the purposes of this part, including the following:

To establish, prescribe, modify, or alter, by
rules and regulations, which shall have the force and effect of law, grades,
standards, and classifications for fresh and processed flowers and foliage, and
minimum requirements for fresh and processed flowers and foliage destined for
shipment by commercial exporters to points outside, and minimum requirements
for containers, packing materials, methods of packing, and requirements for
labeling to be used in packaging fresh and processed flowers and foliage
destined for shipment by commercial exporters to points outside the State.

The department in establishing such rules and
regulations shall consult with appropriate state and federal agencies and with
any appropriate industry or trade organization. The grades, standards,
classifications, minimum requirements for flowers and foliage and requirements
for containers, packing material, methods of packing, and labeling shall be on
the basis of what the department may deem best suited to the agricultural,
horticultural, or other interests of the State. [L 1959, c 267, pt of §2; am L
Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2 and c 139, §2; Supp, §22-26.3; HRS
§147-32]

Cross References

Rulemaking, see
chapter 91.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next